Wisconsin, session 2025, AB773.
do enact as follows:AB773,11Section 1. 302.085 of the statutes is created to read:AB773,2,32302.085 Treatment of a pregnant or postpartum person. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:AB773,2,44(a) “Correctional facility” has the meaning given in s. 101.123 (1) (ac).AB773,2,75(b) “Doula” means a nonmedical, trained professional who provides physical, 6emotional, and informational support during pregnancy, labor, birth, and the 7postpartum period.AB773,2,108(c) “Doula services” means childbirth education and support services, 9including emotional, physical, and informational support provided during 10pregnancy, labor, birth, and the postpartum period.AB773,2,1211(d) “Postpartum” means the period of time following the birth of an infant to 6 12months after the birth.AB773,2,1413(e) “Restrain” means to use a mechanical, chemical, or other device to 14constrain the movement of a person’s body or limbs.AB773,3,215(2) Restraining a pregnant or postpartum person. (a) A representative 16of a correctional facility may restrain a person who is known to be pregnant or who 1has given birth vaginally in the preceding 30 days, or has given birth by cesarean 2section in the preceding 60 days, only if all of the following apply:AB773,3,631. There is a substantial flight risk or some other extraordinary medical or 4security circumstance that requires restraints to be used to ensure the safety and 5security of the person, the staff of the correctional or medical facility, other inmates, 6or the public.AB773,3,1072. The representative has made an individualized determination that 8restraints are necessary to prevent escape or injury or ensure the safety and 9security of the person, the staff of the correctional or medical facility, other inmates, 10or the public.AB773,3,12113. There is no objection to the use of restraints by the treating medical care 12provider.AB773,3,14134. The restraints used are the least restrictive effective type and are used in 14the least restrictive manner.AB773,3,1715(b) A representative of a correctional facility who restrains a person under 16par. (a) shall document, in writing, the representative’s compliance with the 17requirements under par. (a).AB773,3,2018(c) All staff members who may come into contact with a person in labor or 19postpartum person at any correctional facility shall receive training on the 20requirements of this subsection on an annual basis.AB773,3,2221(3) Treatment of a pregnant or postpartum person. A correctional 22facility shall ensure all of the following for every person incarcerated at the facility:AB773,4,21(a) That every woman under 50 years of age is offered testing for pregnancy 2and is asked whether she has given birth in the preceding 24 months or is lactating.AB773,4,43(b) That every pregnant person is offered testing for sexually transmitted 4infections, including HIV.AB773,4,65(c) That every pregnant person who is on medication or is receiving treatment 6be provided continuing medication or treatment.AB773,4,97(d) That every pregnant person and every person who has given birth in the 8past 6 weeks is provided appropriate educational materials and resources related to 9pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, and parenting.AB773,4,1310(e) That every pregnant person and every person who has given birth in the 11past 6 weeks has access to doula or lactation support services if these services are 12provided without charge to the correctional facility or the incarcerated person pays 13for the services.AB773,4,1614(f) That every pregnant person and every postpartum person has access to a 15mental health assessment and, if indicated, mental health treatment, including 16psychotropic medication.AB773,4,2017(g) That every pregnant person who is determined to be suffering from 18depression and every postpartum person who is determined to be suffering from 19postpartum depression has access to evidence-based therapeutic care for 20depression.AB773,5,221(h) That every person who has given birth in the past 24 months whose body 22is producing breast milk has access to the necessary supplies and is provided an 1opportunity to express the breast milk as needed to maintain an active supply of 2breast milk.AB773,5,53(i) That every pregnant person and every postpartum person is advised orally 4and in writing of all applicable laws and policies governing an incarcerated 5pregnant or postpartum person.AB773,5,66